Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.172

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses and interim permits, and the discipline of licensees and permit holders under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 310 s 17; 1998 c 142 s 12; 1996 c 200 s 22; 1987 c 150 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.